Utah statutes.
9-4-1403.   State Community Services Office created -- Purpose.

(1)  There is created within the Division of Housing and Community Development the State Community Services Office.

(2)  The office shall strengthen communities by reducing poverty and improving the quality of life for low-income persons in this state.

